dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="l/ejl__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejl</l><r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jieli</l><r>ejl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/atba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>atba</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tabi</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tiebi</l><r>atba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/afrid__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>afrid</l><r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>efiered</l><r>afrid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/usbieħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>usbieħ</l><r>usbieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siebaħ</l><r>usbieħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għar/us__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajjes</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ublett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ublett</l><r>ublett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bielet</l><r>ublett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/itħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>itħa</l><r>itħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tieħi</l><r>itħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/attus__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>attus</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tates</l><r>attus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/avetta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>avetta</l><r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wievet</l><r>avetta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/erp__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erp</l><r>erp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riep</l><r>erp<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stal/la__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>el</l><r>la<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kox/xa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>xa</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ox</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/arġ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arġ</l><r>arġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ruġ</l><r>arġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/alz__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>alz</l><r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oloz</l><r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/untun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>untun</l><r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>taten</l><r>untun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ubbiena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ubbiena</l><r>ubbiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bieben</l><r>ubbiena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/armug__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>armug</l><r>armug<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rameg</l><r>armug<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/did__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>did</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odda</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bal/la__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>al</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xal/la__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>el</l><r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/oħriet__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oħriet</l><r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaret</l><r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għaġ/ina__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajjen</l><r>ina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/appell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>appell</l><r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piepel</l><r>appell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/eru__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eru</l><r>eru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riewi</l><r>eru<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/offa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>offa</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fief</l><r>offa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/ibka__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ibka</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>biek</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bieki</l><r>ibka<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/unnara__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>unnara</l><r>unnara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nanar</l><r>unnara<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għox/x__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>x</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ux</l><r>x<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/atina__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>atina</l><r>atina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tajjen</l><r>atina<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ejf__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejf</l><r>ejf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juf</l><r>ejf<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għ/anqud__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>anqud</l><r>anqud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enieqed</l><r>anqud<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/azzola__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>azzola</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zazel</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ziezel</l><r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/ażin__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>ażin</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żiena</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rq/iq__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>iq</l><r>iq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aq</l><r>iq<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/urrieqi__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urrieqi</l><r>urrieqi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieraq</l><r>urrieqi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ellum__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ellum</l><r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lielem</l><r>ellum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z/untier__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>untier</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>natar</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieter</l><r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/ormi__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ormi</l><r>ormi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riema</l><r>ormi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="moħriet"><i>m</i><par n="m/oħriet__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zuntier"><i>z</i><par n="z/untier__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="falz"><i>f</i><par n="f/alz__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="demla"><i>dem</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kazzola"><i>k</i><par n="k/azzola__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċella"><i>ċel</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dubbiena"><i>d</i><par n="d/ubbiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sejf"><i>s</i><par n="s/ejf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="rqiq"><i>rq</i><par n="rq/iq__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġebla"><i>ġeb</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="balla"><i>bal</i><par n="bal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħalla"><i>ħal</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="palla"><i>pal</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stilla"><i>stil</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żunnara"><i>ż</i><par n="s/unnara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="musbieħ"><i>m</i><par n="m/usbieħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żarmug"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/armug__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>d</i><par n="d/ar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sunnara"><i>s</i><par n="s/unnara__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamla"><i>qam</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għafrid"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/afrid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċavetta"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/avetta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="umbrella"><i>umbrel</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="katina"><i>k</i><par n="k/atina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="villa"><i>vil</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sellum"><i>s</i><par n="s/ellum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serp"><i>s</i><par n="s/erp__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spalla"><i>spal</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stalla"><i>stal</i><par n="stal/la__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġdid"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/did__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qormi"><i>q</i><par n="q/ormi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dublett"><i>d</i><par n="d/ublett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bitħa"><i>b</i><par n="b/itħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għarus"><i>għar</i><par n="għar/us__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qoffa"><i>q</i><par n="q/offa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għanqud"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/anqud__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="basla"><i>bas</i><par n="bal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pożaumbrella"><i>pożaumbrel</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xatba"><i>x</i><par n="x/atba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xalla"><i>xal</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħażin"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/ażin__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġeru"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/eru__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għaġina"><i>għaġ</i><par n="għaġ/ina__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qattus"><i>q</i><par n="q/attus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sarġ"><i>s</i><par n="s/arġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="koxxa"><i>kox</i><par n="kox/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lejl"><i>l</i><par n="l/ejl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="muntun"><i>m</i><par n="m/untun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żurrieqi"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/urrieqi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għoxx"><i>għox</i><par n="għox/x__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xibka"><i>x</i><par n="x/ibka__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappell"><i>k</i><par n="k/appell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nemla"><i>nem</i><par n="xal/la__n_GD"/></e>
